Wisconsin, session 2025, SB103.
do enact as follows:SB103,11Section 1. Agreement ratified. The legislature ratifies the tentative 2agreement negotiated for the 2024-25 fiscal year between the Board of Regents of 3the University of Wisconsin System and the Wisconsin State Building Trades 4Negotiating Committee, covering employees in the building trades crafts collective 5bargaining unit under subch. V of ch. 111, other than employees who are assigned 6to the University of Wisconsin-Madison, as approved by the employees of the 7building trades crafts collective bargaining unit and approved and recommended by 8the joint committee on employment relations, and authorizes the necessary 9expenditure of moneys for implementation from the appropriations made by s. 1020.865 (1), subject to s. 20.865 (intro.). The Board of Regents of the University of 11Wisconsin System shall file an official copy of the agreement, certified by the 12cochairpersons of the joint committee on employment relations, with the secretary 13of state. No formal or informal agreement between the parties that is not a part of 14the official copy is deemed to be approved by the legislature under this act.SB103,215Section 2. Effective date.SB103,2,1916(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, except that those 17provisions specifically identified as having other effective dates in the agreement 18covering employees in the building trades crafts collective bargaining unit are 19effective on the dates provided in that agreement.SB103,2,2020